en: Dehydrated and reconstituted tomato soup
fr: Soupe à la tomate déshydratée reconstituée
it: zuppa di pomodoro disidratata e ricostituita

en: diced tomatoes in tomato juice
it: pomodori a dadini in succo di pomodoro
lt: pjaustyti pomidorai savo sultyse

en: cherry tomato, cherry tomatoes
bg: чери домат, чери домати
ca: tomàquet cirerol, cirerol
da: körsbärstomater, cocktailtomater
de: Kirschtomaten, Cocktailtomaten, Cherrytomaten
el: τομάτες τσέρυ
es: tomates cerezas, tomate cherry, tomates cherry
fi: kirsikkatomaatti, kirsikkatomaatit
fr: tomate cerise, tomates cerises, tomates cerise
hr: cherry rajčica, rajčica cherry
it: pomodorini, pomodorini ciliegia, pomodoro ciliegino
ja: ミニトマト
nl: kerstomaatjes, cherry tomaat, cheryytomaatjes, cherrytomaten, tomaatjes, snoeptomaatjes, cherrytomaat
nn: cocktailtomater
pl: pomidor koktajlowy, pomidory koktajlowe, pomidorów koktajlowych, pomidorki koktajlowe
pt: tomates cerejas, tomates cereja
sv: körsbärstomater, cherrytomater, cocktailtomater

en: Rivolo cherry tomato
it: pomodorino Rivolo
nl: Rivolo cherrytomaatjes

en: cherry plum tomatoes
de: dattelcherrytomaten
dk: daddelcherrytomater
ee: dattelkirsstomatid
es: tomates cherry pera
fi: luumukirsikkatomaatti
fr: tomate cerise allongée
gr: tomatinia
hr: cherry plum rajčice
hu: datolya cherryparadicsom
it: pomodori datterino
lt: smulkiavaisiai slyviniai pomidorai
nl: dadel-cherrytomaten
pl: pomidory truskawkowe
pt: tomate cherry pêra
ro: rosii cherry prunisoare
se: babyplommontomater
sv: babyplommontomater

fr: tomates semi-séchées, tomate mi-séchée, tomates mi-séchées
de: Tomaten halbgetrocknete, halbgetrocknete Tomaten
it: pomodori semiseccchi

en: dried tomatoes, Dried tomato
it: pomodoro disidratato, pomodori disidratati
ja: ドライトマト

en: sundried tomatoes, sun-dried tomato
it: pomodori secchi

en: peeled tomatoes
bg: белени домати
de: geschälte Tomaten, Schältomaten
es: Tomates pelados
fi: kuorittu tomaatti, kuoritut tomaatit
fr: tomates pelées, tomate pelée
hr: pelata
it: pomodori pelati
nl: gepelde tomaten
pt: tomate pelado

fr: tomates entières pelées
nl: gepelde hele tomaten

en: chopped tomato, chopped tomatoes
cs: krájená rajčata
da: Hakkede tomater
de: gehackte Tomaten, Tomatenhack, Tomatenfruchtfleisch, zerkleinerte Tomaten
el: ψιλοκαμμένη ντομάτα
es: Tomates en trozos, tomate troceado
fi: pilkottu tomaatti, pilkotut tomaatit
fr: tomate concassée, tomates concassées, concassé de tomates
hr: sjeckana rajčica
hu: szeletelt paradicsom
it: pomodori tritati
nb: hakkede tomater
nl: Gehakte tomaten
pl: krojane pomidory
pt: Tomates cortados
sk: krájané rajčiny
sv: Hackade tomater

en: tomato cubes
bg: домати на кубчета
de: Tomatenwürfel
el: κομμάτια ντομάτας σε κυβάκια
es: dados de tomate, tomate en dados
fi: tomaattikuutio, tomaattikuutiot
fr: tomates cubées, tomates en dés, dés de tomates, dés de tomate, tomates en morceaux
hr: kocke rajčice
hu: paradicsomkockák
it: Pomodoro a cubetti
nl: tomatenblokjes
pl: pomidory w kostkach
pt: tomate en cubos
sk: kocky rajčín

en: organic tomato cubes in organic tomato juice
de: Organische Tomatenwürfel in organischem Tomatensaft
fr: purée de tomates avec morceaux
hr: bio kocke rajčice u organskom soku od rajčice
it: cubetti di pomodoro biologico in succo di pomodoro biologico
nl: tomatenblokjes in tomatensap van biologische oorsprong

en: crushed tomato
da: flåede tomater
de: stückige Tomaten, Tomaten stückig
fi: tomaattimurska, tomaattimurskaa
fr: tomates écrasées
hr: zgnječena rajčica
it: Pomodoro schiacciato
nb: knust tomat
nl: geplette tomaten
sv: krossade tomater

en: finely crushed tomato
sv: finkrossat tomat, finkrossade tomater

en: crushed peeled tomato
bg: смачкани белени домати
de: zerkleinerte geschälte Tomate, zerkleinerte Schältomaten
es: Tomate pelado triturado
fi: murskatut kuoritut tomaatit
fr: tomate pelée concassée, tomates pelées concassées
hr: zgnječenog pelata
it: Pomodoro pelato e tritato
nl: gepelde gehakte tomaten

en: tomato pulp
bg: доматен пулп
de: Tomatenfleisch
es: Pulpa de tomate
fi: tomaattimassa, tomaattipulppa, tomaatin hedelmäliha
fr: pulpe de tomate
hr: pulpa rajčice
it: polpa di pomodoro
nl: tomatenpulp
pl: pulpa pomidorowa
pt: polpa de tomate
sv: tomatkött

en: tomato pulp with juice
fr: pulpe de tomate au jus, pulpe de tomates au jus

en: sifted tomato
de: Passierte Tomaten
es: tomates tamizados
fi: seulotut tomaatit
fr: coulis de tomates, coulis de tomate
hr: prosijanu rajčicu
nl: gezeefde tomaten
nn: mosede tomater
pl: passata, passata pomidorowa
pt: tomates passados
se: mosade tomater
sv: passerade tomater

en: tomato purée, passata, tomato passata
bg: доматено пюре
ca: puré de tomàquet
cs: rajčatové pyré, rajčatový protlak
da: tomatpuré, tomatpure
de: Tomatenmark, Tomatenpüree
el: πουρές τομάτας
es: Puré de tomate
et: tomatipüree
fi: tomaattipyree, tomaattipyre, tomaattitiiviste, tomaattisose
fr: purée de tomate, purée de tomates, puree de tomate
he: מחית עגבניות
hu: paradicsompüré
is: tómatpúrra
it: passata di pomodoro
ja: トマトピューレ
lv: tomātu pasta
nb: tomatpuré
nl: tomatenpurée, tomatenpuree
pl: przecier pomidorowy, przecieru pomidorowego
pt: Puré de tomate
ro: piure de roșii, piure de tomate
ru: томатное поре
sk: paradajkový pretlak
sr: pire od paradajza
sv: tomatpuré, tomatpyré, tomatpure, mosade tomater